Hawaii statutes.
§201H-36 Exemption from general excise
taxes. (a) In accordance with section 237-29, the corporation may
approve and certify for exemption from general excise taxes any qualified
person or firm involved with a newly constructed, or moderately or substantially
rehabilitated project:

(1) Developed under this part;

(2) Developed under a government assistance program
approved by the corporation, including but not limited to the United States
Department of Agriculture 502 program and Federal Housing Administration 235
program;

(3) Developed under the sponsorship of a private
nonprofit organization providing home rehabilitation or new homes for qualified
families in need of decent, low-cost housing; or

(4) Developed by a qualified person or firm to
provide affordable rental housing where at least fifty per cent of the
available units are for households with incomes at or below eighty per cent of
the area median family income as determined by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development, of which at least twenty per cent of the
available units are for households with incomes at or below sixty per cent of
the area median family income as determined by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development.

(b) To obtain certification for exemption
under this section, rental housing projects shall, unless exempted by the
corporation, enter into a regulatory agreement with the corporation to ensure
the project's continued compliance with the applicable eligibility requirements
set forth in subsection (a), as follows:

(1) For moderate rehabilitation projects, a minimum
term of five years as specified in a regulatory agreement;

(2) For substantial rehabilitation projects, a
minimum term of ten years as specified in a regulatory agreement; or

(3) For new construction projects, a minimum term of
thirty years from the date of issuance of the certificate of occupancy.

(c) All claims for exemption under this
section shall be filed with and certified by the corporation and forwarded to
the department of taxation. Any claim for exemption that is filed and
approved, shall not be considered a subsidy for the purpose of this part.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

"Moderate rehabilitation" means
rehabilitation to upgrade a dwelling unit to a decent, safe, and sanitary
condition, or to repair or replace major building systems or components in
danger of failure.

"Substantial rehabilitation":

(1) Means the improvement of a property to a decent,
safe, and sanitary condition that requires more than routine or minor repairs
or improvements. It may include but is not limited to the gutting and
extensive reconstruction of a dwelling unit, or cosmetic improvements coupled
with the curing of a substantial accumulation of deferred maintenance; and

(2) Includes renovation, alteration, or remodeling to
convert or adapt structurally sound property to the design and condition
required for a specific use, such as conversion of a hotel to housing for
elders.

(e) The corporation may establish, revise, charge,
and collect a reasonable service fee, as necessary, in connection with its
approvals and certifications under this section. The fees shall be deposited
into the dwelling unit revolving fund. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §3; am L 2015, c
95, §1]

Note

The 2015 amendment applies to projects with an initial
certification date after June 30, 2015. L 2015, c 95, §4.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next